Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.188.092

Lighthouse programs—Science, technology, engineering, and mathematics education lighthouse account.

The science, technology, engineering, and mathematics education lighthouse account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The purpose of the account is to support schools designated as lighthouse schools under *RCW 28A.630.065 to serve as resources to other schools and communities interested in replicating similar models. Revenues to the account may include gifts from the private sector, federal funds, any appropriations made by the state legislature, or revenues from other sources. Grants to the designated lighthouse schools and their administration shall be paid from the account. Only the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2012 c 151 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.630.066.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.630.065 was recodified as RCW 28A.188.090 pursuant to 2013 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 8.